California statutes. Penal Code
(b) An estimate of the annual operating costs of the facility.

(c) A staffing plan for the operation of the facility.

(d) A plan for providing medical, mental health, and dental care to inmates.

(e) A plan for inmate programming at the facility, including education, work, and substance abuse programming.

If the committee fails to take any action with respect to the submitted plans within 45 days after submittal, this inaction shall be deemed to be approval for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 7, Sec. 18.   Effective May 3, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7003.5.

(a) The department shall provide the Joint Legislative Budget Committee with quarterly reports on the progress of funded projects consistent with the requirements outlined in the State Administrative Manual. This report shall include new prisons, projects to construct inmate housing and other buildings at, or within, existing prison facilities, prison medical, mental health, and dental facilities, reentry facilities, and infrastructure projects at existing prison facilities.

(b) On January 10 of each year, the department shall provide a report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee that includes the status of each project that is part of the master plan, including projects planned, projects in preliminary planning, working, drawing and construction phases, and projects that have been completed. The report shall include new prisons; projects to construct inmate housing and other buildings at or within existing prison facilities; prison medical, mental health, and dental facilities; reentry facilities; and infrastructure projects at existing prison facilities.

(c) This section applies to regular prison facilities; projects to expand existing prison facilities; prison medical, mental health, and dental facilities; reentry facilities; and infrastructure projects at existing prison facilities, whether or not built or operated exclusively by the department.

(d) The report required in subdivision (b) shall include the following information for adult and juvenile facilities:

(1) The department’s plans to remove temporary beds in dayrooms, gyms, and other areas, as well as plans to permanently close or change the mission of the facilities.

(2) The department’s plans to construct new facilities, including reentry facilities.

(3) The department’s plans to renovate existing facilities and renovate, improve, or expand infrastructure capacity at existing prison facilities.

(4) The scope of each project identified in the master plan.

(5) The budget for each project identified in the master
 plan.

(6) The schedule for each project identified in the master plan.

(7) A master schedule for the overall plan to deliver the department’s capital outlay program including planned versus actual progress to date.

(8) Staffing plans for each project identified in the master plan, including program, custody, facilities management, administration, and health care.

(9) Total estimated cost of all projects in the master plan by funding source, including planned versus actual expenditures to date.

(10) Projected versus actual population plotted against projected versus actual housing capacity in aggregate and by security level.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 175, Sec. 16.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7004.

The plans required pursuant to Section 7000 shall contain the department’s plan for soliciting and receiving local public comment regarding the placement of a correctional facility in any particular community. The plan shall include provision for notice to a community, including the city, county, or city and county, under consideration for construction of a facility within 30 days after the department has identified a possible site for the proposed facility, public hearings on the proposed facility, and dissemination of the response of the department to comments of the community on the proposed facility.

The plan developed by the department concerning public comment on placement of correctional facilities shall be submitted to the Legislature and the Governor within 60 days of the effective date of this section. The plan shall be implemented as of the date of submission to the Governor and Legislature with respect to all prospective placements of correctional facilities. The Legislature and the Governor shall also be sent any subsequent changes or revisions of the plan by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 365, Sec. 1.   Effective July 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

7004.5.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall meet with representatives of cities or, if the prison is located in an unincorporated location, counties, whenever the Legislature authorizes the planning, design, or construction of new permanent housing units. The meeting shall take place prior to the completion of the review required by Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code. The department shall describe the scope of the project and the project schedule, and shall consider comments from the city or county representatives
 regarding the project’s impact.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 7, Sec. 20.   Effective May 3, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7005.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, mitigation funding shall be distributed to any local education agency, or any city, county, or city and county as a result of the construction of new permanent prison housing facilities, the activation of temporary beds as part of the Emergency Bed Program authorized by the Budget Acts of 1995 and 1996, and any future emergency bed expansions by the Department of Corrections if funds for that purpose are appropriated to the department in the annual Budget Act or any other act approved by the
 Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 593, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7005.5.

(a) Any funds appropriated for mitigation costs pursuant to Section 7005 shall be divided as follows: one-half for allocation among any impacted local education agency, and one-half for allocation among any impacted city, county, or city and county.

(b) Any funds appropriated for mitigation of costs of a city, county, or city and county shall be divided among any city, county, or city and county impacted by the prison construction or expansion.

(c) Funds to be allocated among any impacted city, county, or city and county shall be paid directly to each impacted entity by the Department of Corrections upon receipt of resolutions adopted by the governing body of each impacted city, county, or city and county indicating agreement by an entity regarding the specific allocations to that entity. Only a local impacted entity whose current approved sphere of influence includes the site of increased inmate housing capacity shall be deemed to be a jurisdiction eligible for mitigation pursuant to Section 7005.

(d) Funds to be allocated among any impacted local education agency shall be disbursed to the county superintendent of schools for allocation among any impacted local education agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 593, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7006.

(a) The Department of the Youth Authority is authorized to transfer to the Department of Corrections title to any property of the Preston School of Industry at Ione not currently being used by the Department of the Youth Authority. 

(b) The Department of the Youth Authority is authorized to transfer to the Department of Corrections title to any property of the Northern California Youth Center near Stockton not currently being used by the Department of the Youth Authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1743, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

7008.

(a) Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code shall not apply to the addition of 150 Level I and Level II beds authorized by Section 5 of this act at San Gabriel Canyon, provided that the department has made the following finding with respect to that facility:

(1) The increase in bed capacity, if any, shall not exceed, 5 percent of the total capacity of the facility prior to the increase.

(2) Any modifications made to existing structures are internal
 only. No external additions to existing structures or construction of new structures shall be done. Modular structures used exclusively for prisoner program activity shall be exempt from this requirement.

(3) Any modifications to a facility shall not result in a significant depletion in water, sewage, or other environmental resources. The department shall present substantial evidence that this requirement has been met in the findings described in subdivision (b).

(b) The department shall make findings that the requirements of subdivision (a) have been met, and shall make the findings available to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 933, Sec. 2.   Effective September 25, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

7010.

(a) The Director of Corrections may solicit bids for any lease or lease-purchase for the establishment of a prison facility for a site in Los Angeles County.

(b) The director may not accept any lease or lease-purchase bid or execute any lease or lease-purchase agreement unless and until the bid or agreement is submitted for review and approval under the procedure described in Section 7003.

(c) Any lease or lease-purchase agreement executed pursuant to this section shall contain, as a condition of the
 agreement, stipulations requiring compliance with the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of the Labor Code in the construction of any facility within the scope of the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1742, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7011.

(a) The Department of Corrections shall submit to the Joint Legislative Prison Committee, the Kings County Board of Supervisors, the Corcoran City Council, and the State Public Works Board, at least 30 days prior to the acquisition of real property for a prison facility to be located in the vicinity of Corcoran in Kings County, an environmental assessment study, which shall include a discussion of impacts and mitigation measures, if necessary, for the following areas:

(1) Geology.

(2) Hydrology—groundwater.

(3) Water quality—surface waters.

(4) Plant and animal life—endangered and rare species.

(5) Air quality.

(6) Noise.

(7) Light and glare.

(8) Transportation and circulation.

(9) Utilities—gas, electricity, telephone, solid waste, sewage disposal, and drinking water.

(10) Archaeology.

(11) Energy.

(b) The factors set forth in
 subdivision (a) shall be assessed only as they relate to the direct impacts caused off the site as a result of the construction, operation, and maintenance of the prison facility upon completion and occupancy.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, other than Section 7003 and those provisions of the Government Code that require the approval of the State Public Works Board, the Department of Finance, or the Director of Finance for capital outlay projects, the approval of the study by the State Public Works Board is the only approval required for the acquisition of real property, planning, design, and construction of the prison facility and the operation and maintenance of the facility. The State Public Works Board shall not act on the study until it receives a recommendation from the Joint Legislative Prison Committee. Approval of the study by the State Public Works Board shall be final and binding on all parties.

(d) If the committee does not, by a majority vote of the committee membership, take any action on the study within 30 days after submittal, that inaction shall be deemed to be a recommendation of concurrence for the purposes of this section.

(e) Prior to providing a recommendation to the State Public Works Board, but within the 30-day period specified in subdivision (d), the committee shall hold a public hearing in Corcoran. Notice of the hearing shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in, or adjacent to, Corcoran. The notice shall be at least one-quarter page in size. The Corcoran City Council and the Kings County Board of Supervisors shall be invited to participate in the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 931, Sec. 2.   Effective September 25, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

7012.

(a) The Department of Corrections shall submit to the Joint Legislative Prison Committee, the State Public Works Board, the appropriate county board of supervisors, and the local city council at least 30 days prior to the acquisition of real property for prison facilities to be located in Riverside and Del Norte Counties, an environmental assessment study, which shall include a discussion of impacts and mitigation measures, if necessary, for the following areas:

(1) Geology.

(2) Hydrology-groundwater.

(3) Water quality-surface waters.

(4) Plant and animal life-endangered and rare species.

(5) Air quality.

(6) Noise.

(7) Light and glare.

(8) Utilities-gas, electricity, telephone, solid waste, sewage disposal, and drinking water.

(9) Archaeology.

(10) Energy.

(b) The factors set forth in subdivision (a) shall be
 assessed only as they relate to the direct impacts caused off the site as a result of the construction, operation, and maintenance of the prison facility upon completion and occupancy.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, other than Section 7003, the approval of the study by the State Public Works Board is the only approval required for compliance with any applicable environmental requirements. The Public State Works Board shall not act on the study until it receives a recommendation from the Joint Legislative Prison Committee. Approval of the study by the State Public Works Board shall be final and binding on all parties.

(d) If the committee does not, by a majority vote of the committee membership, take any action on the study within 30 days after submittal, that inaction shall be deemed to be a recommendation of concurrence for the purposes of this section.

(e) Prior to providing a recommendation to the State Public Works Board, but within the 30-day period specified in subdivision (d), the committee shall hold a public hearing in the community in the vicinity of the proposed site. Notice of the hearing shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in, or adjacent to, that community. The notice shall be at least one-quarter page in size. The city council and the county board of supervisors shall be invited to participate in the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 854, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7013.

The Department of Corrections shall contract, or make a good-faith effort to contract, with the Department of Water Resources or the Bureau of Reclamation, or both, to secure a water supply for the prison at Avenal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 931, Sec. 2.5.   Effective September 25, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

7015.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the Department of Corrections may contract with the City of Folsom for the construction of a courthouse and related facilities, not to exceed one million nine hundred thousand dollars ($1,900,000) in costs. Under this contract, the Department of Corrections is authorized to make payments to the City of Folsom in consideration for the construction of the courthouse, provided that the sums paid to the city are realized from savings to the department by the location of the courthouse in the immediate proximity of Folsom Prison.

Under this contract, the
 Department of Corrections is authorized to make annual payments to the City of Folsom in an amount not to exceed the approximate savings realized in each fiscal year. These funds shall come from the operating budget of the department.

In negotiating this contract, the Department of Corrections shall note the extent to which the courthouse will serve the interests of the County of Sacramento independent of matters pertaining to individuals in state custody and shall seek appropriate participation in the funding of the courthouse from the county.

(b) The Department of Corrections may not contract with the City of Folsom for a court facility unless a majority of the members of the Sacramento County Board of Supervisors, the presiding judge of the Sacramento County Municipal Court, and the presiding judge of the Sacramento County Superior Court all agree, in writing, to operate a court facility in the City
 of Folsom as provided by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1393, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7016.

The Department of Corrections may contract with the County of Kern for the construction and financing of a courthouse and related facilities. Under this contract, the Department of Corrections is authorized to make payments to the County of Kern in consideration for the construction and financing of the courthouse and related facilities, provided that the sums paid to the county are realized from savings to the department by the location of the courthouse in the proximity of the California Correctional Facility in Tehachapi.

In accordance with the contract, the Department of Corrections is authorized to make annual
 payments to the County of Kern from the approximate savings realized in each fiscal year. These funds shall come from the operating budget of the department. In negotiating this contract, the Department of Corrections shall note the extent to which the courthouse will serve the interest of the County of Kern independent of matters pertaining to individuals in state custody, and seek appropriate county participation in funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1400, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7050.

(a) (1) Section 28 of Chapter 7 of the Statutes of 2007 contains an appropriation of three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) for capital outlay to be allocated to renovate, improve, or expand infrastructure capacity at existing prison facilities. The funds appropriated by that section may be used for land acquisition, environmental services, architectural programming, engineering
 assessments, schematic design, preliminary plans, working drawings, and construction.

(2) These funds may also be used to address deficiencies related to utility systems owned by local government entities and serving state prison facilities subject to the provisions of Section 54999 of the Government Code. The department shall report on any funds to be expended for this purpose to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. If the committee fails to take any action with respect to each notification within 20 days after submittal, this inaction shall be deemed to be approval for purposes of this section.

(3) These funds may also be used for the design and construction of improvements to dental facilities at state prison facilities.

(4) These funds may also be used for the design and construction of improvements to
 medication distribution facilities at state prison facilities.

(5) These funds may also be used for the design and construction of projects in the Health Care Facility Improvement Program at state prison facilities.

(6) This subdivision authorizes the scope and cost of a single capital outlay project for purposes of calculating augmentations pursuant to Section 13332.11 or 13332.19.

(b) The scope and costs of the projects described in subdivision (a) of this section shall be subject to approval and administrative oversight by the State Public Works Board, including augmentations, pursuant to Section 13332.11 or 13332.19 of the Government Code. The availability of an augmentation for each individual project allocation shall be based on the total applicable capital outlay appropriation contained in Section 28 of
 Chapter 7 of the Statutes of 2007 and is not limited to 20 percent of the individual project allocation. These requirements shall be applied separately to each institution. All of the necessary infrastructure improvements at each institution may be treated as one project such that there would be one infrastructure improvement project at each institution. The scope and cost of each infrastructure improvement project shall be established by the board individually. The amount of the total appropriation in Section 28 of Chapter 7 of the Statutes of 2007 that is necessary for each infrastructure improvement project shall be allocated by institution. The appropriation may be allocated based on current estimates. These initial allocations may be adjusted commensurate to changes that occur during the progression of the projects. As allocations are made or adjusted, the anticipated deficit or savings shall be continuously tracked and reported. Once the total appropriation has been allocated, any augmentation
 necessary to fund an anticipated deficit shall be based on the total appropriation and allocated to each project as necessary. Concurrent with the request to the board to establish each project authorized pursuant to this section, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall report the associated scope, cost, and schedule information to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(c) The projects authorized pursuant to this section shall be part of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation’s master plan, as defined in Section 7000.

(d) The reporting requirements set forth in Sections 7000 to 7003.5, inclusive, shall apply separately to each project authorized pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 26, Sec. 35.   (AB 1468)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. New Prison Construction Bond Act of 1986 [7300. - 7311.]

7300.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the New Prison Construction Bond Act of 1986.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 54 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7301.

The State General Obligation Bond Law is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this chapter, and the provisions of that law are included in this chapter as though set out in full in this chapter except that, notwithstanding anything in the State General Obligation Bond Law, the maximum maturity of the bonds shall not exceed 20 years from the date of each respective series. The maturity of each respective series shall be
 calculated from the date of such series.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 54 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7302.

There is in the State Treasury the 1986 Prison Construction Fund, which fund is hereby created. The proceeds of the sale of bonds authorized by this act shall be deposited in this fund and may be transferred upon request of the Department of Corrections and upon approval of the Director of Finance, to the 1984 Prison Construction Fund established by Section 7202. If the moneys are so transferred, “fund” means the 1984 Prison Construction Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 54 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7303.

The 1986 Prison Construction Committee is hereby created. The committee shall consist of the Controller, the State Treasurer, and the Director of Finance. That committee shall be the “committee,” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law.

The Department of Corrections is the “board” for the purpose of the State General Obligation Bond Law and this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 54 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7304.

The committee is hereby authorized and empowered to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000), in the manner provided in this chapter. That debt or debts, liability or liabilities, shall be created for the purpose of providing the fund to be used for the object and work specified in Section 7306.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 54 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7305.

The committee may determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue any bonds authorized under this chapter, and if so, the amount of bonds then to be issued and sold. The committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds herein authorized at such time or times as may be fixed by the Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 54 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7306.

The moneys in the fund shall be used for the acquisition, construction, renovation, remodeling, and deferred maintenance of state youth and adult corrections facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 54 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7307.

(a) All bonds herein authorized, which shall have been duly sold and delivered as herein provided, shall constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereon.

(b) There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is
 collected such a sum, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, as shall be required to pay the principal and interest on those bonds, and it is hereby made the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of that revenue to do and perform each and every act which shall be necessary to collect that additional sum.

(c) All money deposited in the fund which has been derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(d) All money deposited in the fund pursuant to any provision of law requiring repayments to the state which are financed by the proceeds of the bonds authorized by this chapter shall be available for transfer to the General Fund. When transferred to the General Fund that money shall be applied as a reimbursement to the General
 Fund on account of principal and interest on the bonds which has been paid from the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 54 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7308.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of this chapter such an amount as will equal the following:

(a) That sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal of and the interest on the bonds issued and sold pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(b) That sum as is necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 7309, which sum is
 appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 54 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7309.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the Director of Finance may by executive order authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which the committee has by resolution authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund and shall be disbursed by the committee in accordance with this chapter. Any money made available under this section to the board shall be
 returned by the board to the General Fund from moneys received from the sale of bonds sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Those withdrawals from the General Fund shall be returned to the General Fund with interest at the rate which would otherwise have been earned by those sums in the Pooled Money Investment Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 54 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7309.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this bond act, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this bond act that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any
 rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law, or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 652, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

7310.

All proceeds from the sale of bonds, except those derived from premiums and accrued interest, shall be available for the purpose provided in Section 7306 but shall not be available for transfer to the General Fund to pay principal and interest on bonds. The money in the fund may be expended only as herein provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 54 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7311.

Money in the fund may only be expended pursuant to appropriations by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 54 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. New Prison Construction Bond Act of 1988 [7400. - 7414.]

7400.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the New Prison Construction Bond Act of 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 43, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 80 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7401.

The State General Obligation Bond Law is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this chapter, and the provisions of that law are included in this chapter as though set out in full in this chapter except that, notwithstanding anything in the State General Obligation Bond Law, the maximum maturity of the bonds shall not exceed 20 years from the date of each respective series. The maturity of each respective series shall be
 calculated from the date of that series.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 43, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 80 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7402.

There is in the State Treasury the 1988 Prison Construction Fund, which fund is hereby created. The proceeds of the sale of bonds authorized by this act shall be deposited in the fund, and may be transferred upon request of the Department of Corrections and upon approval of the Director of Finance, to the New Prison Construction Fund established by Section 7102, the 1984 Prison Construction Fund established by Section 7202, or the 1986 Prison
 Construction Fund established by Section 7302, or any combination thereof. If the moneys are so transferred, “fund” means the New Prison Construction Fund, 1984 Prison Construction Fund, or 1986 Prison Construction Fund, or any combination thereof, as is appropriate. At least 30 days prior to requesting a transfer as authorized by this section, the Department of Corrections shall notify the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature, and the Chairperson and the Vice Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(History: Amended (as proposed to be added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 43) by Stats. 1988, Ch. 386, Sec. 3.   Approved, in this amended form, in Proposition 80 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7403.

The 1988 Prison Construction Committee is hereby created. The committee shall consist of the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance. That committee shall be the “committee,” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law.

The Department of Corrections is the “board” for the purpose of the State General Obligation Bond Law and this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 43, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 80 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7404.

The committee is hereby authorized and empowered to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the state, in the aggregate principal amount of eight hundred fifteen million seven hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($815,755,000), excluding refunding bonds, in the manner provided in this chapter. That debt or debts, liability or liabilities, shall be created for the purpose of providing the fund to be used for the object and work specified in Section 7406.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 255, Sec. 16.   (AB 184)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7405.

The committee may determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue any bonds authorized under this chapter, and if so, the amount of bonds then to be issued and sold. The committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds herein authorized at such time or times as may be fixed by the Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 43, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 80 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7406.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the moneys in the fund shall be used for the acquisition, construction, renovation, remodeling, and deferred maintenance of state youth and adult correctional facilities.

(b) Of the moneys in the fund, forty million dollars ($40,000,000) is hereby appropriated to the Board of Corrections to fund those projects entitled to be funded under subdivision (c) of Section 3 of Chapter 444 of the Statutes
 of 1984, as amended, to the extent that those projects have not received full funding and for any costs associated with the sale of bonds and any administrative costs incurred by the Board of Corrections in the administration of the County Jail Capital Expenditure Bond Acts of 1981 and 1984 and the County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure Bond Act of 1986.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 11 of Chapter 1519 of the Statutes of 1986 or any other provision of law to the contrary, and subject to the annual Budget Act appropriations by the Legislature, administrative costs shall not exceed 112 percent of the amount allocated for any costs incurred by the Board of Corrections in the administration of the County Jail Capital Expenditure Bond Acts of 1981 and 1984 and the County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure Bond Act of
 1986.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 43, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 80 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7407.

(a) All bonds herein authorized, which shall have been duly sold and delivered as herein provided, shall constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both the principal thereof and interest thereon.

(b) There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue
 is collected such a sum, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, as shall be required to pay the principal of and interest on those bonds, and it is hereby made the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of that revenue to do and perform each and every act which shall be necessary to collect that additional sum.

(c) All money deposited in the fund which has been derived from premiums or accrued interest on bonds sold shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(d) All money deposited in the fund pursuant to any provision of law requiring repayments to the state which are financed by the proceeds of the bonds authorized by this chapter shall be available for transfer to the General Fund. When transferred to the General Fund that money shall be applied as a reimbursement to the
 General Fund on account of the principal of and interest on the bonds which has been paid from the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 43, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 80 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7408.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of this chapter such an amount as will equal the following:

(a) That sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal of and the interest on the bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter.

(b) That sum as is necessary to carry out the provisions
 of Section 7409, which sum is appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 43, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 80 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7409.

For the purpose of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may by executive order authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which the committee has by resolution authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund and shall be disbursed by the committee in accordance with this chapter. Any money made available under this section to the board shall be returned by the board
 to the General Fund from moneys received from the sale of bonds sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Those withdrawals from the General Fund shall be returned to the General Fund with interest at the rate which would otherwise have been earned by those sums in the Pooled Money Investment Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 43, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 80 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

7409.5.
